Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.290

Local improvement districts and utility local improvement districts—Appellate review.

The decision of the board of county commissioners upon any objections made within the time and in the manner herein prescribed, may be reviewed by the superior court upon an appeal thereto taken in the following manner. Such appeal shall be made by filing written notice of appeal with the clerk of the board of county commissioners and with the clerk of the superior court within ten days after the resolution confirming such assessment roll shall have become published, and such notice shall describe the property and set forth the objections of such appellant to such assessment. Within the ten days from the filing of such notice of appeal with the clerk of the superior court, the appellant shall file with the clerk of said court, a transcript consisting of the assessment roll and his or her objections thereto, together with the resolution confirming such assessment roll and the record of the board of county commissioners with reference to said assessment, which transcript, upon payment of the necessary fees therefor, shall be furnished by such clerk of the board of county commissioners and by him or her certified to contain full, true and correct copies of all matters and proceedings required to be included in such transcript. Such fees shall be the same as the fees payable to the county clerk for the preparation and certification of transcripts on appeal to the supreme court or the court of appeals in civil actions. At the time of the filing of the notice of appeal with the clerk of the superior court a sufficient bond in the penal sum of two hundred dollars, with sureties thereon as provided by law for appeals in civil cases, shall be filed conditioned to prosecute such appeal without delay, and if unsuccessful, to pay all costs to which the county is put by reason of such appeal. The court may order the appellant upon application therefor, to execute and file such additional bond or bonds as the necessity of the case may require. Within three days after such transcript is filed in the superior court, as aforesaid, the appellant shall give written notice to the clerk of the board of county commissioners that such transcript is filed. Said notice shall state a time, not less than three days from the service thereof, when the appellant will call up the said cause for hearing. The superior court shall, at said time or at such further time as may be fixed by order of the court, hear and determine such appeal without a jury, and such cause shall have preference over all civil causes pending in said court, except proceedings under an act relating to eminent domain in such county and actions of forcible entry and detainer. The judgment of the court shall confirm, correct, modify or annul the assessment insofar as the same affects the property of the appellant. A certified copy of the decision of the court shall be filed with the officer who shall have the custody of the assessment roll, and he or she shall modify and correct such assessment roll in accordance with such decision. Appellate review of the judgment of the superior court may be sought as in other cases. However, review must be sought within fifteen days after the date of the entry of the judgment of such superior court. The supreme court or the court of appeals on such appeal may correct, change, modify, confirm or annul the assessment insofar as the same affects the property of the appellant. A certified copy of the order of the supreme court or the court of appeals upon such appeal shall be filed with the officer having custody of such assessment roll, who shall thereupon modify and correct such assessment roll in accordance with such decision.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4155; 1988 c 202 s 41; 1971 c 81 s 98; 1967 c 72 s 29.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.